en: Applesauces, Apple sauces
de: Apfelmus, Apfelbrei
fi: omenasoseet
fr: Compotes pommes nature
hr: Umaci od jabuka
it: Salse di mele
lt: Obuolių tyrė
nl: Appelsauzen
se: omenasose

en: Peach applesauce
de: Pfrisich-Apfel-Sauce
fr: Compotes pommes pêche
hr: Umak od breskve i jabuke
it: Composte mela e pesca
lt: Persikų ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Perzik appelcompotes

en: Pear applesauces
de: Birnen-Apfelmus
fi: päärynä-omenasoseet
fr: Compotes pommes poires
hr: Kruške jabuke
it: Composte mela e pera
lt: Kriaušių ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Peer appelcompotes

fr: Compotes pommes pruneau
lt: Džiovintų slyvų ir obuolių tyrė

en: Rhubarb applesauces
de: Rhabarber-Apfelmus, Rhabarber-Apfel-Purée, Rhabarber-Apfel-Kompott
fr: Compotes pommes rhubarbe
hr: Rabarbara jabuke
it: Composte mela e rabarbaro
lt: Rabarbarų ir obuolių tyrė
nl: Rhabarber appelcompotes

fr: Compotes pommes vanille
it: Composte mela e vaniglia
lt: Vanilės ir obuolių tyrė

fr: Compotes pommes ananas
it: Composte mela e ananas
lt: Ananasų ir obuolių tyrė

fr: Compotes pommes figue
it: Composte mela e fico
lt: Figų ir obuolių tyrė

fr: Compotes pommes cerise
it: Composte mela e ciliegia
lt: Vyšnių ir obuolių tyrė

fr: Compotes pommes kiwi
it: Composte mela e kiwi
lt: Kivių ir obuolių tyrė

fr: Compotes pommes caramel
it: Composte mela e caramello
lt: Karamelės ir obuolių tyrė

fr: Compotes pommes prune
lt: Slyvų ir obuolių tyrė

en: Sweet mousses, sweet mousse, sugary mousses, sugary mousse
es: Mousses dulces
fi: makeat vaahdot
fr: Mousses sucrées, mousse sucrée
hr: Slatke pjenice
it: Mousse dolci
lt: Saldūs putėsiai
nl: Mousses met suiker

en: Fruit mousses, Refrigerated fruit mousse
fi: Hedelmämousset
fr: Mousses aux fruits, Mousse aux fruits rayon frais
hr: Voćne pjene
nl: Vruchtenmousse

en: Chestnut mousses
fr: Mousses aux marrons
hr: Pjene od kestena
lt: Kaštonų putėsiai

en: Dairy mousses
fi: maitopohjaiset vaahdot
fr: Mousses lactées, mousses au lait, mousses à base de lait
hr: Mliječne pjene
it: Mousse a base di latte
lt: Pieno putėsiai
nl: Mousses op basis van melk

en: Entremets - mousses and creamy puddings
fr: Entremets - mousses et crème desserts

en: Creamy puddings, Dessert creams, Custard desserts
ca: Postres cremoses
de: Cremedesserts
es: Postres de cremas
fi: jälkiruokakermat
fr: Crèmes dessert, Crèmes desserts, Crèmes dessert lactées, crèmes dessert à base de lait, crèmes dessert au lait
hr: Kremasti puding
it: Creme dolci
lt: Desertiniai kremai, kreminiai desertai
nl: Vla's
pt: Cremes de sobremesa

en: Refrigerated creamy puddings, Refrigerated dessert creams, Refrigerated custard desserts
de: Gekühlte Dessertcremes, gekühlte Puddingdesserts
fr: Crèmes dessert rayon frais
hr: Ohlađeni kremasti puding
it: Creme dessert refrigerate
lt: Šaltai laikomi desertiniai kremai
nl: Bevroren dessertroom
pt: Cremes de sobremesa refrigerados

en: Double flavour creamy puddings, Double flavour custard dessert
fr: Crèmes dessert double saveur
hr: Kremasti puding dvostrukog okusa
nl: Dubbel vla's, Dubbelvla's